Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1095.
do enact as follows:AB1095,11Section 1. 115.28 (7) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1095,2,52115.28 (7) (c) Subject to s. 118.19 (4m) and (7s), license and make rules for the 3examination and licensing of persons, including teachers, employed to provide 4publicly funded special education and related services, as those terms are defined 5in s. 115.76 (14) and (15).AB1095,26Section 2. 118.19 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1095,3,177118.19 (3) (a) No license to teach in any public school may be issued unless the 8applicant possesses a bachelor’s degree including such professional training as the 9department by rule requires, except as permitted under par. (b), sub. (7s), and ss. 10115.28 (17) (a), 118.191, 118.1915, 118.192, 118.193, 118.194, and 118.197. 11Notwithstanding s. 36.11 (16), no teacher preparatory program in this state may be 12approved by the state superintendent under s. 115.28 (7) (a), unless each student in 13the program is required to complete student teaching consisting of full days for a 1full semester following the daily schedule and semester calendar of the cooperating 2school or the equivalent, as determined by the state superintendent. No license to 3teach in any public school may be granted to an applicant who completed a 4professional training program outside this state unless the applicant completed 5student teaching consisting of full days for a full semester following the daily 6schedule and semester calendar of the cooperating school or the equivalent, as 7determined by the state superintendent. The state superintendent may grant 8exceptions to the student teaching requirements under this paragraph when the 9midyear calendars of the institution offering the teacher preparatory program and 10the cooperating school differ from each other and would prevent students from 11attending classes at the institution in accordance with the institution’s calendar. 12The state superintendent shall promulgate rules to implement this subsection. If 13for the purpose of granting a license to teach or for approving a teacher preparatory 14program the state superintendent requires that an institution of higher education 15be accredited, the state superintendent shall accept accreditation by a regional or 16national institutional accrediting agency recognized by the U.S. department of 17education or by a programmatic accrediting organization.AB1095,318Section 3. 118.19 (7s) of the statutes is created to read:AB1095,3,2419118.19 (7s) Notwithstanding subs. (4m), (6) to (9), (12), and (14), the state 20superintendent shall issue a license that authorizes the license holder to be 21employed as a speech-language pathologist in a public school to an individual who 22holds a valid license to practice speech-language pathology issued by the hearing 23and speech examining board under subch. II of ch. 459 or a valid speech-language 24pathologist compact privilege.AB1095,41Section 4. PI 34.026 (1) (d) of the administrative code is repealed.AB1095,52Section 5. PI 34.028 (2) (d) and (4) (b) of the administrative code are 3repealed.AB1095,64Section 6. PI 34.040 (2) (j) of the administrative code is repealed and 5recreated to read:AB1095,4,96PI 34.040 (2) (j) Speech-language pathologist. The applicant for school 7speech-language pathologist holds a valid speech-language pathologist license 8issued by the hearing and speech examining board under s. 459.24, Stats., or a valid 9speech-language pathologist compact privilege.AB1095,710Section 7. PI 34.0475 (2) (b) of the administrative code is repealed.AB1095,811Section 8. Initial applicability.AB1095,4,1412(1) This act first applies to an application for a school speech-language 13pathologist license received by the department of public instruction on the effective 14date of this subsection.AB1095,915Section 9. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 16publication, except as follows:AB1095,4,1817(1) The treatment of administrative rules takes effect as provided in s. 18227.265.AB1095,4,1919